src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_NIEJTE ;
LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
   +Sg:  NIEJTE_SG    ;
   +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL    ;
         EVEN_ESS     ;
 +Attr:e FINAL1       ;
         NIEJTE_CMPND ;

LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ;
LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
   +Sg:  NIEJTE_SG    ;
   +Pl:  NIEJTE_PL ;
         EVEN_ESS     ;
 +Attr:e FINAL1       ;
         NIEJTE_CMPND ;


!LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN-plc
!   SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN_FLAG ; ! To be fixed

!LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN ;
!LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE-LOAN ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:e         FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>edh     FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>emem    FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>emdh    FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>mse    FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>ene     FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se     FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>esanne  FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>esadth  FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>estanne FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>estadth FINAL1   ;
!                      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine     FINAL1   ;
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>enadth  FINAL1   ;
!                             +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e         RHyph    ;
!!  +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
!                             +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:          EVEN_ESS ;
!                        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:e         FINAL1   ;


!LEXICON TJØNNIN ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
!@U.Cap.Obl@ TJØNNIN_INFL ;

!LEXICON TJØNNIN_INFL ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:i%>n   FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:i%>n   RHyph    ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgGen:i%>n   RHyph    ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:i%>m   FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:i%>n   FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:e%>se  FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1   ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1   ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom:i%>h        FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
!! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:       EVEN_ESS ;
!   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:i%>n   FINAL1   ;


LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
@U.Cap.Obl@ SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR_INFL ;
LEXICON SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR_INFL ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl:    NIEJTE_PL ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Cmp/PlGen:%>i RHyph     ;
    +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:    EVEN_ESS  ;





LEXICON STAABREH_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ STAABREH ;
LEXICON STAABREH ! as NIEJTE, but with Prop tag
        +Cmp/SgNom:e%>       RHyph    ;
         +Pl+Nom:e%>h      FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Nom:h         FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Acc:%>ide     FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Gen:%>i       FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Ill:%>ide     FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Ine:%>ine     FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Ela:%>ijste   FINAL1   ;
         +Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1   ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie FINAL1   ;
       +Cmp/PlGen:%>i       RHyph    ;


LEXICON STAABREH-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: STAABREH_FLAG ;


LEXICON STAABREH-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: STAABREH_FLAG ;


!LEXICON STAABREH-ani
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: STAABREH_FLAG ;
!
!LEXICON STAABREH-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: STAABREH_FLAG ;
!
!LEXICON STAABREH-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: STAABREH_FLAG ;
!
!LEXICON STAABREH-sur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: STAABREH_FLAG ;
!
!
!LEXICON STAABREH-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: STAABREH_FLAG ;





LEXICON AEKTUVE
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: AEKTUVE_FLAG ;

LEXICON AEKTUVE_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ AEKTUVE_DECL ;
LEXICON AEKTUVE_DECL
  +Sg:            ÅERUVE_SG      ;
  +Pl:            ÅERUVE_PL      ;
                  ÅERUVE_ESS     ;      
+Cmp/SgNom:uve%^DISIMP  RHyph         ;
+Cmp/SgGen:uve%^DISIMP  RHyph         ;
 +Attr:uve          FINAL1       ;

!LEXICON LAANTE-plc
!land+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:land CNAME_EVENLEX_PLC-ORG_FLAG ; ! Småland
!laante+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:laant SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ; ! Smålaante

!LEXICON LAANTE-sur
!land+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:land CNAME_EVENLEX_FLAG ; ! Småland
!laante+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:laant SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Smålaante

!LEXICON NAME_KONTO
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg: KONTO_SG ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: EVEN_ESS ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl: KONTO_PL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: RHyph ;
!
!LEXICON ELV-plc
!:^elv CNAME_EVEN-plc ;
!:^elv SNAME_MAANA-plc ;
!+Err/Orth:^elven CNAME_ODD-plc ;
!
! Consonant final names

! - - - - - - - - -
LEXICON HANNOLA-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: HANNOLA-ODD_SG ;

LEXICON HANNOLA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: HANNOLA-ODD_SG ;


LEXICON HANNOLA-ODD_SG
              +Sg+Nom:a            FINAL1             ; 
           +Cmp/SgNom:a            RHyph              ;
           +Cmp/SgGen:a            RHyph              ;
              +Sg+Acc:am           FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Gen:an           FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1             ; 
              +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1             ;


!- ca 57 - ODD - syllable 


LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
@U.Cap.Obl@ SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_INFL ;
LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_INFL
      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:             SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
      +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:             N_ODD_ESS          ; ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr:             FINAL1             ; ! name special


LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_ODD_SG
              +Sg+Nom:             FINAL1             ; ! Herodes, Aasen
           +Cmp/SgNom:            RHyph              ;
           +Cmp/SgGen:            RHyph              ;
              +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1             ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
              +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1             ;
              +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1             ;

!LEXICON CNAME_ODD-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

!LEXICON CNAME_ODD-plc
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: CNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:        CNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

LEXICON CNAME_ODD_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ CNAME_ODD ;
