src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aarejaevriengïeles:Aare^jaevrien^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD ;
Aegkiegïeles:Aegkie^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "13 TERRTX" ;
Aektuve:Aekt AEKTUVE ;
Alvilde:Alvild SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Annemarie:Anne^mari SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Apple:Appl SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; !Applasse, Applese
Atlantic:Atlantic CNAME_ODD-org ;
Bender:Bender CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Berith:Berith CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Berlingske:Berlingsk SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Bernkonvensjovne+Use/Sub:Bern^konvensjonen CNAME_ODD-org ;
Biessiegïeles:Biessie^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "21 TERRTX" ;
Bijjie% Gass-Såvvoen:Bijjie% Gass-Såvvoen SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Bijjie% Gass-Såvvoen:Bijjie% Gass-Såvvoen SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "21 VATTTX" ;
Bockelie:Bocke^li SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Brömsebrofreden+Use/Sub:Brömse^bro^freden CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Carter:Carter CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Cecilie:Cecili SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Cesare:Cesar SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Draupne:Draupn SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Ebeneser:Eben^eser CNAME_ODD-org ;
Elen:Elen CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Elysium:Elysi^um CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Eos:Eos CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Eunike:Eunik SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ;
Faahtsangïeles:Faahtsan^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "62 TERRTX" ;
Fenresulven:Fenres^ulven CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Fife:Fif SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Finne:Finn SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Foiniks:Foiniks CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Føniks:Føniks CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Gaelpientjonneh:Gaelpien^tjonn STAABREH ;
Genigraphics:Geni^graphics CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Gjølme:Gjølm SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Goddard:Goddard CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Greenpeace:Greenpeac SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Guhkiestjonneh:Guhkies^tjonn STAABREH ;
Gáren:Gáren CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Hildur:Hildur CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Håkonshallen:Håkons^hallen CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Ianke:Iank SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Ihalainen:Ihalainen CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Intel:Intel CNAME_ODD-org ;
Jakobine:Jakobin SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Jannick:Jannick CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Jassehkentjonneh:Jassehken^tjonn STAABREH ;
Joevegïeles:Joeve^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "21 TERRTX" ;
Kerberos:Kerberos CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Kirste:Kirst SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Kirstin:Kirstin CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Koreakrigen+Use/Sub:Korea^krigen CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Kukkurainen:Kukkurainen CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Lie:Li SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Life:Lif SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Linos:Linos CNAME_ODD-org ;
Maatstjonneh:Maats^tjonn STAABREH ;
Maiken:Maiken CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Margarethe:Margareth SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Midgardsormen:Mid^gards^ormen CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Miesjhketjahkentjåånnh:Miesjhke^tjahken^tjåånn SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Miesjhketjahkentjåånnh:Miesjhke^tjahken^tjåånn SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "21 VATTTX" ;
Mirjam:Mirjam CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Mountains:Mountains CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Myers:My^ers CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Nilsine:Nilsin SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Njeerevaerietjeenth:Njeere^vaerie^tjeent SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "9 VATTDRTX" ;
NoKTuRNL:NoKTuRNL CNAME_ODD-org ;
Noerhtetjahkh:Noerhte^tjahk SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "9 TERRTX" ;
Nordtømme:Nordtømm SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Norske:Norsk SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Ovles:Ovles CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Raavtemetjålhth:Raavteme^tjålht SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "62 TERRTX" ; 
Riefling:Riefling CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Rigel:Rigel CNAME_ODD-org ;
Sarre:Sarr SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
Shannon:Shannon CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Shape:Shap SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Sieteretjonneh:Sietere^tjonn STAABREH ;
Silje:Silj SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Sjnjearehkentjöönnh:Sjnjearehken^tjöönn SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "61 VATTTX" ;
Skaalngetjeenth:Skaalnge^tjeent SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Skaarvdurrientjahkh:Skaarv^durrien^tjahk SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "26 TERRTX" ;
Snickers:Snickers CNAME_ODD-obj ;
Solvår:Sol^vår CNAME_ODD-fem ;
Staabreh:Staabr STAABREH "26 TERRTX" ;
Supermann:Supermann CNAME_ODD-ani ; 
Svaaletjahkh:Svaale^tjahk SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "26 TERRTX" ;
Svarten:Svarten CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Svingen:Svingen CNAME_ODD-sur ;
SÁLAS:SÁLAS CNAME_ODD-org ;
Taurus:Taurus CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Tetlie:Tetli SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ;
Time-Life:Time-Lif SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Tjeehpesgïeles:Tjeehpes^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "62 TERRTX" ;
Tulokas:Tulokas CNAME_ODD-ani ;
Vanne:Vann SNAME_NIEJTE-fem ; 
Vijriegïeles:Vijrie^gïeles SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "62 TERRTX" ;
Volkswagen:Volks^wagen CNAME_ODD-org ;
Vuelie% Gass-Såvvoen:Vuelie% Gass-Såvvoen SAAMI_CNAME_ODD "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Webcrawler:Web^crawler CNAME_ODD-obj ;
WheelMouse:Wheel^Mous SNAME_NIEJTE-org ; 
Wildhagen:Wild^hagen CNAME_ODD-sur ;
Åarkatjåånh:Åarka^tjåån SNAME_NIEJTE_PLUR "61 VATTDRTX" ;
Ølstykke:Øl^stykk SNAME_NIEJTE-sur ; 
